District of Columbia statutes.
9-202.03

Exceptions from requirement of referral of application to National Capital Planning Commission.

Section 9-202.02(3) shall not apply to any application to close all or part of an alley in the circumstances enumerated in § 9-202.05(2), (4)(A), (5), or (6).

Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-201, § 203, 30 DCR 148

History

This section is referenced in § 9-202.02.

Section References

1981 Ed., § 7-423.

Prior Codifications